Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 294.060, 294.468 and 368.705, moneys from  federal
sources in the county road  fund of Curry County, Klamath County or Yamhill County may
be loaned to:
(a) Any taxing district located within the county;
(b) Another county; or
(c) Any taxing district located in another county.
(2) The amount of the loan may not exceed the lesser of:
(a) The amount of operating taxes estimated to be collected by the taxing  district or the
county to which the moneys  are to be loaned, plus interest, for a period of 20 consecutive
years; or
(b) The estimated annual debt service amounts that can reasonably be  estimated to be
available for  the term of the loan to the taxing district or the county to which the moneys
are to be loaned, after subtracting any other financial or legal  obligations of the borrower
taxing district or county.
(3)(a) Moneys may be loaned under this section only pursuant  to a legally binding inter-
governmental agreement or loan agreement entered into by the governing bodies of the
borrower taxing district or the county and the lender county.
(b) The intergovernmental agreement or loan agreement must contain provisions that:
(A) Fix  the principal amount of the loan and state the method of determining the rate
of interest. The rate  of interest may not be less than the average rate of return earned over
the immediately preceding 12-month period by moneys of the lender county placed in  the
investment pool as defined in ORS 294.805.
(B) Fix the term of the loan and the schedule of the payments of principal and interest.
(C) Pledge the operating  tax revenues of the borrower taxing district or county as secu-
rity for repayment of the loan, plus interest.
(D) Identify the purpose for which the taxing district or  the county is borrowing the
moneys.
(E) Establish remedies in favor of the lender county if the borrower taxing  district or
county is unable to meet the annual debt service obligations.
(4) The governing bodies of the borrower taxing district or  county and the lender county
shall account for the loan and the  repayment obligation, including interest, in their annual
budgets for the term of the loan.
Enrolled House Bill 3435 (HB 3435-B) Page 1
(5) A county that makes a loan under this section shall disclose the loan to the  Oregon
Municipal Debt Advisory Commission.
(6) Moneys from state and local sources that are  subject to Article IX, section 3a, of the
Oregon Constitution, may not be loaned under this section.
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House June 21, 2017
Repassed by House July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 4, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3435 (HB 3435-B) Page 2